District of Columbia statutes.
2-1710

Right of examination of public records.

(a)

The Administrator shall from time to time review the condition of public records, and shall give advice and assistance to officials in the solution of problems of preserving, cataloging, filing, and making readily available for governmental and public use the records in their custody.

(b)

Upon request by the Administrator, each custodian shall prepare an inclusive inventory of all public records in his or her custody.

Sept. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-19, § 11, 32 DCR 3590
1981 Ed., § 1-2910.